Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. False Applications, Claims and Proof of Loss

§ 26-13-201.
False applications, claims and proofs of loss prohibited.

No person shall knowingly or willfully:

Make any false or fraudulent statement or representation in or with reference to any application for insurance or for the purpose of obtaining any money or benefit;

Present or cause to be presented a false or fraudulent claim or any proof in support of a claim for the payment of the loss upon a contract of insurance;

Prepare, make or subscribe a false or fraudulent certificate, or other document with intent that the certificate or other document may be presented or used in support of the claim.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 265; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-265; W.S. 1977, §

26-13-124

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-13-202.
Penalties.

Any person who violates this article is subject to the penalty provided in W.S.

26-1-107

, or as provided by any other applicable law which provides a greater penalty.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 265; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-264; W.S. 1977, §

26-13-124

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.